Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB763.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 502.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of an offense committed by an innocent or irresponsible person
when he or she:
(a) Acts with the culpability that is sufficient for commission of that offense; and
(b) Causes that innocent or irresponsible person to engage in conduct constituting
the offense.
(2) As used in this section, an "innocent or irresponsible person" includes anyone who
is not guilty of the offense in question, despite his or her participation, because of:
(a) Criminal irresponsibility or other legal incapacity or exemption; or
(b) Unawareness of the criminal nature of the conduct in question or the
defendant's criminal purpose; or
(c) Any other factor precluding the mental state sufficient for the commission of
the offense in question.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:28 AM Jacketed